Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 456.250 is amended to read:
456.250. As used in this section and ORS 456.255 to 456.265:
[(1) “Federal housing program” means a federal project-based  Section 8 subsidized housing pro-
gram.]
(1) “Affordability restriction” means a limit on rents that  a property owner may charge
at a participating property or a limitation on the  use of a participating property as set forth
in a contract.
(2) “Contract” means a written agreement entered into by a property owner under  which
a participating property becomes publicly supported housing that is subject to  an
affordability restriction. “Contract” includes, but is  not limited to, a deed restriction, loan
agreement, operating  agreement or any other written agreement that results in an
affordability restriction being placed on the property.
[(2)] (3)  “Local government” means a city,  county, public corporation, metropolitan service dis-
trict or other district , political subdivision or any board, commission or agency thereof .
[(3)] (4)  “Participating property” means property that is the  subject of a contract [ between the
property owner and the United States Department  of Housing and Urban Development for participation
in a federal housing  program ] by which the property becomes publicly supported housing that
is subject to an affordability restriction .
(5)(a) “Publicly supported housing” means  a multifamily rental housing development of
five or more units that receives or benefits from government assistance under:
(A) A contract for rent assistance from the United States  Department of Housing and
Urban Development, the United States Department of  Agriculture or the Housing and Com-
munity Services Department that contains an affordability restriction; or
(B) A contract that  is for any other type of government assistance or subsidy that in-
cludes an affordability restriction and that is identified  in rules adopted by the Housing and
Community Services Department.
(b) “Publicly supported housing” does not include a multifamily rental  housing develop-
ment:
(A) For which the development or developer  receives only a construction excise tax
waiver, a system development charge waiver, a fee waiver or a property tax abatement;
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 1
(B) That is part of an inclusionary housing  program as defined by local government and
authorized under chapter 59, Oregon Laws 2016;
(C) That receives tenant-based federal rent subsidy payments under the Housing Choice
Voucher Program authorized by 42 U.S.C. 1437f;
(D) That receives project-based rental assistance administered  by a housing authority
under section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437f (o)(13)); or
(E) That receives tenant vouchers from  the United States Department of Agriculture
under section 542 of the Housing Act of 1949 (42 U.S.C. 1471).
(6) “Qualified purchaser” means a local government entitled to notice under ORS  456.260,
the Housing and Community Services Department or  a designee appointed by the department
under section 6 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 2.  ORS 456.255 is amended to read:
456.255. (1) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that:
(a) The maintenance of a pool of affordable  housing for all citizens is a matter of statewide
concern.
(b) The contracts for many participating properties in  this state that [ participate in federal
housing programs ] are publicly supported housing  are about to expire or otherwise terminate .
State and  local governments need an effective process  for assessing these expiring and terminat-
ing contracts and determining  whether to assume ownership of the participating properties. The
assessment and determination process should  ensure appropriate statewide uniformity while main-
taining local flexibility. The process should  also ensure the rights of property owners and tenants
to fair treatment as the contracts expire.
(2) ORS [ 456.260 and] 456.255 to 456.265 are intended to provide a framework for addressing  the
withdrawal of participating property from [ federal housing programs ] publicly supported housing.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 456.260 is amended to read:
456.260. (1) [ In establishing a  procedure to deal ] For the purpose of dealing  with expiring and
terminating contracts for participating properties, [ a local government may: ]
[(a) Require ] the owner of a participating property [ to] shall:
[(A)](a) Provide notice  by registered or certified mail,  return receipt requested,  [ of the
pending contract expiration ] to each local government  [that has requested ] entitled to notice and the
Housing and Community Services Department  [ and each affected tenant one  year ] two years
prior to the date when :
(A) The contract for the property to participate in [ a federal housing program ] publicly sup-
ported housing will expire  or terminate; or
(B) The participating property will be withdrawn  from publicly supported housing,
whether by sale, transfer, nonrenewal of the contract or otherwise,  such that the property
will no longer be a participating property .
[(B) Provide notice that the owner intends to withdraw the property from participation in a federal
housing program to each local government that has requested notice and each affected tenant up to: ]
[(i) 210 days prior to the expiration of the contract; or ]
[(ii) 150 days prior to the expiration of a one-year extension of the contract, if any. ]
[(C)] (b)  Consent to reasonable inspection of  the property and inspection of the owner reports
on file with the Housing and Community Services Department or the United  States Department of
Housing and Urban Development , if applicable.
[(D)] (c)  Maintain the contract  for property participation in [ a federal housing program ] publicly
supported housing in  good standing[ , if the United States Department of Housing and Urban Devel-
opment allows that maintenance, ] during[ :]
[(i)] the notice period[ s] referred to under this [ paragraph] section [;]
[(ii) Any condemnation proceeding commenced; or ]
[(iii) Any alternative procedure agreed to under paragraph (c) of this subsection ].
[(E)] (d)  Refrain from taking any action, other than notifying the United States  Department of
Housing and Urban Development or other party to the  contract  of the owner’s intention to not
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 2
renew the contract  or to  withdraw the participating property from publicly supported
housing, that  would preclude [ the] a qualified purchaser [affected local government or its designee ]
from succeeding to the contract or negotiating with the owner for the purchase of the property.
(2) A local government is  entitled to notice under this section if the participating prop-
erty is located within the boundaries of the local government.
(3) If the property owner does not comply with the notice requirements under  subsection
(1) of this section, the property owner shall  extend the affordability restriction on the par-
ticipating property by the number of months that  the property owner is in noncompliance
with the notice  requirements under subsection (1) of this section and immediately provide
notice to the Housing and  Community Services Department and each local government that
is entitled to notice of the extension of the affordability  restriction pursuant to this section
together with the notice required under subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply when:
(a) A local government or the state takes the  participating property by eminent domain
or a negotiated purchase in lieu of eminent domain;
(b) There is a forced sale of the participating property under a foreclosure; or
(c) The participating property is subject to a deed in lieu of foreclosure.
[(b)] (5) A local government may:
(a) Establish and  impose any fine, penalty, tax, fee, charge or assessment upon the owner of
participating  property  for failure to comply with local regulations adopted [ pursuant to paragraph
(a) of this subsection ] to implement the provisions of subsection (1) of this section .
[(c) Establish an alternative procedure to condemnation, including  but not limited to arbitration,
mediation or facilitated negotiation. However, an alternative procedure may not be used unless mutually
agreed to by the property owner and the local government. ]
[(d)] (b)  Require  an owner to refrain from disturbing tenancies, other than for cause as defined
in the contract, for a period of not more than 180 days after expiration  of the contract  or with-
drawal of the participating property from publicly supported housing  if  the local government
pays, or arranges  for payment, to the owner on the first day of each month, the monthly subsidy that
the owner was receiving under the contract.
(c) Make application to the Housing and Community Services Department requesting that
a local subsidy program be included  in the definition of publicly supported housing, as long
as the program otherwise complies with and is not excluded from  the definition of publicly
supported housing.
[(2)] (6)  Any notices provided under subsection (1)(a) of this section shall specify whether  the
owner:
(a) Intends to withdraw the participating property from  [ a federal housing program ] publicly
supported housing.
(b) Intends to convert the participating property to a nonparticipating use.
(c) Is involved in negotiations with the United States Department of Housing and Urban De-
velopment , [or] the Housing and Community Services Department  or any other individual or entity
regarding an extension of an expiring [ participation] contract.
[(3)] (7)  ORS 456.255 to 456.265 do not require the Housing and  Community Services De-
partment or  a local government  to purchase, condemn or otherwise acquire participating property.
(8) The Housing and  Community Services Department shall adopt rules to implement the
provisions of this section with respect  to the duties, powers and functions of the department.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 456.265 is amended to read:
456.265. (1) Except as expressly authorized in ORS 456.260 [ (1)] or sections 6 and 7 of this 2017
Act or as may be provided by contract with the property owner, a local government may not:
(a) Impose any fine, penalty, tax, fee, charge, assessment or  other restriction or sanction against
a property owner for withdrawing the participating property from [ a federal housing  program ] pub-
licly supported housing.
(b) Except as an exercise of constitutional or statutory powers of condemnation:
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 3
(A) Prevent or restrict a  property owner from selling or otherwise disposing of participating
property.
(B) Require conveyance of participating property to the local government or to another party.
(C) Impose any fine, penalty,  tax, fee, charge, assessment or other restriction or sanction against
a property owner for refusing an offer by the Housing and Community Services Department, the
department’s designee, a  local government or another party to purchase participating property.
[(c) Require a property owner to pay any replacement fee or other fee for tenant relocation from
participating property, except as specified in an alternative procedure being used pursuant to  ORS
456.260 (1)(c).]
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not prohibit a local government that is  certified by a
federal agency to carry out an  agency responsibility or to exercise agency authority from taking
any action within the scope of that responsibility or authority.
SECTION 5.
Sections 6, 7 and 8  of this 2017 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
456.255 to 456.265.
SECTION 6. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of  this section, a property owner
shall provide notice by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the Housing
and Community Services Department and each  local government entitled to notice under
ORS 456.260, of the  opportunity to offer to purchase a participating property at least 13
months prior to the occurrence of any of the following actions if the action will result in
withdrawal of the participating property from publicly supported housing:
(a) Refinancing of the primary mortgage;
(b) Recapitalizing for purposes of rehabilitation or repair;
(c) Entering into an agreement to sell the property to a new property owner; or
(d) Withdrawing the participating property from publicly supported housing.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply when:
(a) A local government or the state takes the  participating property by eminent domain
or a negotiated purchase in lieu of eminent domain;
(b) There is a forced sale of the participating property under a foreclosure; or
(c) The participating property is subject to a deed in lieu of foreclosure.
(3)(a) The property owner shall provide  the notice required in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion to afford  the qualified purchasers the opportunity to purchase required by this section
within the time frames indicated in subsection (5) of this section.
(b) A property owner is under no obligation to accept a  qualified purchaser’s offer made
pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.
(4) The department may  appoint a designee to act as purchaser of the participating
property and shall give the property owner notice of the appointment of a  designee. The de-
partment must  consult with each local government where the property is located before ap-
pointing a designee under this  subsection. The department must enter into a written
agreement with the appointed designee  providing that the designee and any of the designee’s
successors or assigns:
(a) Agree to preserve the affordability of the participating property; and
(b) Assume all  rights and responsibilities attributable to the department as a prospective
purchaser of the participating property.
(5) A qualified purchaser may, within 90 days from the date of  a property owner’s notice
under subsection (1) of this section, submit an offer to the property owner to purchase the
participating property. Failure by all  qualified purchasers to submit a timely offer consti-
tutes an irrevocable waiver of the each qualified purchaser’s rights  under this section, and,
subject to section 7 of this 2017 Act, the property owner may  sell the participating property
to a third party or withdraw the participating property from publicly supported housing.
(6) If, within 210 days from the date of a  property owner’s notice under subsection (1)
of this section or within such other period  of time to which the qualified purchasers and the
property owner may agree,  the property owner has not accepted any qualified purchaser’s
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 4
offer to purchase  the participating property, each qualified purchaser’s offer shall expire,
each qualified purchaser’s right to purchase the participating property under this  section
shall terminate and, subject to section 7 of this 2017 Act, the property owner may sell  the
participating property to a third party or withdraw the participating property from  publicly
supported housing.
(7) At any time after the notice described in subsection (1)  of this section has been pro-
vided, a qualified purchaser may request, in writing, that the  property owner make available,
within 30 days of the request,  documents that are relevant to the participating property at
the property owner’s principal place of business or at a commercial photocopying facility.
(8)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions  of ORS 192.410 to 192.505 relating to public records,
the documents provided by the property owner to a qualified purchaser under subsection (7)
of this section  are confidential and exempt from public inspection except with the written
consent of the property owner or as ordered by a court.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of  this subsection, disclosure may be made to potential
funding sources, regulatory agencies or agents or  consultants of a qualified purchaser in
connection with a transaction between the property  owner and a qualified purchaser under
this section, subject to appropriate confidentiality agreements.
(9) The department shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 7.
(1)(a) Within the first 180 days following the expiration of the offer to  pur-
chase period described in section 6 (6) of this 2017 Act, a property owner  may accept a third
party’s offer to  purchase the participating property. This acceptance shall be made subject
to the property owner providing each qualified purchaser the right of first refusal  to pur-
chase the property on the same terms and conditions as the third party’s offer  to purchase,
subject to subsection (2) of this section, unless  those terms and conditions are modified by
mutual consent between the qualified purchaser and the property owner.
(b) The property owner shall provide notice, by registered or certified mail,  return re-
ceipt requested, to each qualified purchaser of the terms and conditions of  the third party’s
offer to purchase. A qualified purchaser shall have 30 days  from the date the notice is mailed
to exercise its right of first refusal by submitting a matching offer to purchase  the property.
The property owner shall accept the  first matching offer the property owner receives from
a qualified purchaser under this section.
(c) A  qualified purchaser’s offer is a matching offer if it is on the same terms and con-
ditions as the third party’s offer to  purchase but for modifications to ensure compliance with
subsection (2)  of this section, unless those terms and conditions are modified by mutual
consent among the qualified purchaser and the property owner.
(2) If a qualified purchaser exercises its right of first refusal, the qualified purchaser  and
property owner shall execute a purchase agreement on the  same terms and conditions as the
third party’s offer, except that:
(a) The earnest money  deposit may not exceed the lesser of two percent of the sales price
or $250,000;
(b) The earnest money deposit must be refundable for at least 90 days; and
(c) Closing shall be scheduled at least 240 days after execution  of the purchase agree-
ment.
(3) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply when:
(a) A local government or the state takes the  participating property by eminent domain
or a negotiated purchase in lieu of eminent domain;
(b) There is a forced sale of the participating property under a foreclosure;
(c) The participating property is subject to a deed in lieu  of foreclosure or a negotiated
purchase to avoid foreclosure;
(d) There are more than 30 years remaining before the first scheduled termination  of an
affordability restriction on the property;
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 5
(e) The property owner accepted a  third party’s offer to purchase the participating
property before the effective date of this 2017 Act and has provided documentation  of the
purchase agreement to the Housing and Community Services Department;
(f) The third party offeror  agrees to maintain the affordability restrictions on the par-
ticipating property, as determined by the department  by rule, to ensure that the participat-
ing property remains publicly supported housing; or
(g) Any additional situations as determined by the department by rule.
(4) A property owner that sells participating property to a third party shall certify that
the owner has complied with all provisions of ORS 456.260, this section and  section 6 of this
2017 Act. A certification of compliance under this section shall:
(a) Be recorded  in the real property records of the county in which the property is lo-
cated;
(b) Contain a legal description of the property;
(c) Identify the property owner as the grantor; and
(d) Be acknowledged by the property owner in the  manner required for acknowledgment
of a deed.
(5) The department shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 8.
(1) Any person who suffers any ascertainable loss  of money or property, real
or personal, as a result of the failure  of an owner of a participating property to provide no-
tices or otherwise comply with the provisions of ORS 456.260 or sections 6 or 7 of  this 2017
Act may bring an individual action in  an appropriate court to recover actual damages. The
court or the jury may award punitive damages, and the  court may provide injunctive relief
and any other equitable relief the court considers necessary and proper.
(2) The court may award reasonable  attorney fees and costs at trial and on appeal to a
prevailing plaintiff in an action under this section.
SECTION 9.  ORS 456.559, as amended by section 6, chapter 61, Oregon Laws 2016,  is amended
to read:
456.559. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department shall:
(a) Maintain current housing data and information concerning available programs, status  of
funding, programs planned or undertaken which  might conflict with, overlap, duplicate or supersede
other planned or existing programs and call these to the attention of appropriate state  agencies,
governmental bodies and public or private housing sponsors.
(b) Maintain current data from local, state and federal sources concerning publicly sup-
ported housing as that term is defined in ORS  456.250, the status of existing affordability
restrictions as that term is defined  in ORS 456.250 and rental assistance contracts at publicly
supported housing.
[(b)] (c)  Provide to appropriate state agencies, governmental bodies and  public or private hous-
ing sponsors such advisory and educational services as will assist them in the  development of
housing plans and projects.
[(c)] (d)  Subject to the approval of the Oregon Housing Stability Council, make noninterest
bearing advances, in accordance  with ORS 456.710 and the policies of the department, to qualified
nonprofit sponsors for development costs of housing projects until mortgage funds are released to
repay the advances as provided in ORS 456.710.
[(d)] (e) Advise and assist appropriate state agencies, governmental bodies and public or private
housing sponsors, cities and counties, in all programs and  activities which are designed or might
tend to fulfill the purposes of ORS 456.548 to 456.725 and ORS chapter 458.
[(e)] (f)  Encourage and assist  in the planning, development, construction, rehabilitation and
conservation of dwelling units for persons and families of lower income.
[(f)] (g)  Be the central state department to apply for, receive and distribute,  on behalf of ap-
propriate state agencies, governmental bodies and  public or private housing sponsors in the state,
grants, gifts, contributions, loans, credits or assistance from the  federal government or any other
source for housing programs except when the donor,  grantor, or lender of such funds specifically
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 6
directs some other agency  to administer them. Moneys received under this section shall be deposited
with the State Treasurer in  an account separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned
by the account shall be credited to the account.
[(g)] (h)  For the purposes of acquiring moneys, credits or other assistance from any agency or
instrumentality of the United States or from any  public corporation chartered by the United States,
comply with any applicable agreements or restrictions for the receipt  of such assistance and become
a member of any such association or public corporation chartered by the United States.
[(h)] (i) Assist individuals, appropriate state agencies, governmental bodies  and public or private
housing sponsors through a program which provides housing  information, planning, educational
services and technical assistance.
[(i)] (j)  Comply with the  requirements of ORS 443.225 in assisting in the development of any
housing for residential care, training or treatment for  persons with mental retardation, develop-
mental disabilities or mental or emotional disturbances.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 456.255 to 456.265 and  456.625 (7) and sections 1 to
3, chapter 61, Oregon Laws 2016,  and sections 6 and  7 of this 2017 Act,  the department may not
itself develop,  construct, rehabilitate or conserve housing units; and neither the department nor any
housing sponsor, including but not limited to any association, corporation, cooperative housing au-
thority  or  urban renewal agency organized to provide housing and other facilities [ pursuant to ]
under ORS 456.548 to 456.725, may own, acquire, construct, purchase, lease, operate  or maintain
utility facilities, including facilities for the generation of  electricity, for the distribution of gas and
electricity, and for the conveyance of telephone and telegraph messages.
(3) In accordance with the  provisions of this section and with the advice of the council, the
department shall establish statewide priorities for housing programs.  State agencies shall coordinate
their housing programs with the department. All state agencies intending to apply for  federal funds
for use in planning, developing or  managing housing, or rendering assistance to governmental bodies
or sponsors or individuals involved therein shall submit a description of the proposed  activity to the
department for review not less than 30 days prior to the  intended date of submission of the appli-
cation to the federal agency. The department  shall determine whether the proposal would result in
a program that would overlap, duplicate or conflict with any other housing program in the  state. If
the department finds overlapping or duplication or conflict, it shall recommend modifications  in the
application. The Oregon  Department of Administrative Services shall consider these recommenda-
tions in making its decision  to approve or disapprove the application. The department shall complete
its review and forward its recommendations within 15 working days after receipt of the notification.
Failure of the department to complete the review within that time shall constitute approval of  the
application by the department.
(4) The Director of the Housing and Community Services Department may  participate in dis-
cussions and deliberations of the council. The director  may suggest policies and rules to the council,
including those  necessary to stimulate and increase the supply of housing for persons and families
of lower income.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 456.574 is amended to read:
456.574. (1) There is created in the General Fund of the State Treasury the Housing and Com-
munity Services  Department Revolving Account. All moneys deposited in the account are contin-
uously appropriated for the purposes of carrying out  the programs which the Housing and
Community Services Department is charged  with administering subject to limitations otherwise
prescribed by law.
(2) The Housing and Community Services Department may transfer to the Housing and  Com-
munity Services  Department Revolving Account amounts not to exceed $250,000 from funds available
to the department. Such funds hereby are continuously appropriated for:
(a) The making of advances under ORS 456.559 (1)(d) [ (1)(c)] or 456.710; and
(b) The use by the department in the payment of expenses  incurred by the department in car-
rying out ORS 456.548  to 456.725; however, any such funds expended by the department under this
paragraph shall be repaid by the department into the revolving account from the fees and  charges
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 7
collected under ORS 456.625 (3) and from  any other moneys available for such repayment in ac-
cordance with ORS 456.548 to 456.725.
SECTION 10a. Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Housing and Community Services Department by  section 1, chapter __,
Oregon Laws 2017  (Enrolled House Bill 5012), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, is in-
creased by $453,320 for the purpose of implementing sections 6 and 7 of this 2017 Act and
ORS 456.260 and 456.559, as amended by sections 3 and 9 of this 2017 Act, except  that the
funds appropriated by this section  may not be used for earnest money deposits or purchase
price payments for the purchase of real property.
SECTION 11.
(1) Sections 6 and 8 of  this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 456.250,
456.255, 456.260, 456.265, 456.559 and 456.574 by sections 1 to 4, 9 and 10  of this 2017 Act apply
to participating properties that are publicly supported housing on or after the effective  date
of this 2017 Act and that are subject to contracts executed  or renewed prior to, on or after
the effective date of this 2017 Act.
(2) Section 7 of this 2017  Act applies to participating properties that are publicly sup-
ported housing subject to contracts  executed or renewed on or after the effective date of this
2017 Act.
SECTION 12. Sections 6, 7 and  8 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 456.250,
456.255, 456.260, 456.265, 456.559 and 456.574 by  sections 1 to 4, 9 and 10 of this 2017 Act be-
come operative January 1, 2018.
SECTION 13. The Housing and Community Services  Department may take any action
after the effective date specified in section 14  of this 2017 Act but before the operative date
specified in section  12 of this 2017 Act that is necessary for the department to exercise, on
and after the operative date specified in section  12 of this 2017 Act, all of the duties, func-
tions and powers conferred on the board  by sections 6, 7 and 8 of this 2017 Act and the
amendments to ORS  456.250, 456.255, 456.260, 456.265, 456.559 and 456.574 by sections 1 to 4,
9 and 10 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 14. This 2017 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2002 (HB 2002-B) Page 8